Hawaii statutes.
§652-10 Debts payable in future. If
upon disclosure made on oath by the debtor it appears that the garnishee is
indebted to the defendant, but that the debt is not payable and will not become
due until some future time, then such judgment as the plaintiff may recover
shall constitute a lien upon the debt until and at the time it becomes due and
payable. [L 1876, c 35, §12; RL 1925, §2840; RL 1935, §4279; RL 1945, §10310;
RL 1955, §237-10; HRS §652-10]

Case Notes

Section held inapplicable under the circumstances. 10 H.
499, 504 (1896).

Cited: 48 H. 68, 76, 395 P.2d 691 (1964).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next